California, session 20252026, AB1591.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Podiatric Pipeline Program Act.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)California faces a growing shortage of Doctors of Podiatric Medicine particularly in rural and underserved communities. (b)(a) Many undergraduate students are unaware of podiatric medicine as a career path and lack opportunities for mentorship and exposure to the field.(c)(b) Establishing an undergraduate-to-podiatric-medical-school pathway will increase awareness, diversity, and the number of students entering podiatric programs in California.(d)(c) Two accredited podiatric medical schools operate in California, the California School of Podiatric Medicine at Samuel Merritt University and the Western University of Health Sciences College of Podiatric Medicine, and can serve as anchor partners for such a pipeline.SEC. 3. Article 6 (commencing with Section 128055) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: Article 6. California Podiatric Pipeline Program128055. (a) The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall establish and administer the California Podiatric Pipeline Program to promote careers in podiatric medicine and support the educational advancement of California residents pursuing the doctor of podiatric medicine degree.(b) In consultation with the California State University, the University of California, the Podiatric Medical Board of California, the California Podiatric Medical Association, and accredited schools of podiatric medicine in California, the department shall take actions that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) Developing partnerships and agreements that link undergraduate institutions with California podiatric medical schools.(2) Providing mentorship, outreach, and clinical-shadowing opportunities for undergraduate students interested in podiatric medicine.(3) Creating a structured pathway for eligible students to receive early admission consideration to participating podiatric medical schools, contingent on meeting academic and professional benchmarks.(4) Prioritizing recruitment of students from underrepresented, rural, or medically underserved areas of the state.(c) The department may award planning or coordination grants to participating universities or colleges to support implementation of this program as funding is made available.(d) The department may use funds from the Health Professions Education Fund or Health Professions Pathways Program for the purposes of this article, subject to the requirements of Article 1 (commencing with Section 128330) of Chapter 5.(e) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature, shall annually report to the Legislature on the number of students participating, the number matriculating into doctor of podiatric medicine programs, and recommendations for expanding residency opportunities for podiatric graduates.(2) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.128056. Implementation of this article shall be contingent upon appropriation by the Legislature.128057. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.